Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Development of Region Bordering Pearl River.

§ 51-9-1.
Pearl River Industrial Commission created.

There is created the Pearl River Industrial Commission, composed of Hinds, Leake, Madison, Neshoba, Rankin and such other counties in the state through which or bordering which the Pearl River runs. The Governor shall appoint one (1) member to the commission from each county from a list of three (3) names to be submitted by the board of supervisors in each participating county. The three (3) names submitted by the board of supervisors of Madison County and the board of supervisors of Rankin County shall be the names of persons who reside on and are holders of residential leases from the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District that are located in Madison County and Rankin County, respectively, or who reside in established subdivisions in Madison County and Rankin County, respectively, in which some of the residential property of the subdivision is leased from the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District. In his appointment the Governor shall designate the chairman and vice chairman of the commission. Each member of the commission shall serve for a term concurrent with that of the Governor. The board of supervisors in any county through which or by which the Pearl River runs, other than those counties named above, may bring that county in as a member of the commission by resolution presented to the Governor; and the board of supervisors in such county may, in its discretion, call an election before taking such action, the election to be held as nearly as possible in the same manner other elections are held in the county.

The member appointed from Madison County who is serving on July 1, 2012, shall continue to serve until January 1, 2013, after which date the Governor shall appoint a member from Madison County who meets the residency requirements of this section. The person appointed under the provisions of this paragraph shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-41; Laws, 1956, ch. 169, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1979, ch. 309; Laws, 2012, ch. 549, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 51-9-3.
Compensation and organization.

The members shall serve without pay except they shall be reimbursed out of county funds provided by this article for their actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, in an amount equal to travel and subsistence expenses allowed state employees under law. Upon appointment, said members shall meet and organize at some place designated by the governor, which shall be in one of the participating counties; and the members shall set a regular time and place for the members of the commission to meet, secure offices and all necessary equipment, and employ such engineering, professional, clerical, stenographic, and other assistance as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. An executive director may be appointed by the board if this is deemed advisable, and salaries of all personnel may be paid out of funds provided under the terms of this article in an amount agreeable to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-41; Laws, 1956, ch. 169, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-9-5.
Powers and duties.

The Pearl River Industrial Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary or deemed by it advisable in making a survey or surveys of the region bordering the Pearl River, to investigate the possibilities of developing such areas from an industrial, irrigational, and recreational standpoint, to attract new industries, and to conserve available water for irrigational and industrial purposes, acting in co-operation with the federal government or any agency thereof and with any other interested groups. It is contemplated that plans be considered and drawn and surveys made for the location of industrial sites and making the most advantageous use of available water supplies, to protect against pollution and to devise methods of disposing of industrial waste, and adapting a long-range plan of sewerage disposal for the area. The commission is charged with the responsibility of co-operating with the state board of water commissioners created by Section 51-3-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-41; Laws, 1956, ch. 169, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-9-7.
Funding.

The commission shall be financed in all its activities from funds made available by each of the associated counties, and each such county is authorized and empowered to contribute any amount or amounts which the board of supervisors thereof shall deem advisable, acting in their sole discretion, to be paid from the general county fund of the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-41; Laws, 1956, ch. 169, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-9-9.
Article supplementary to other laws.

This article shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws, and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-41; Laws, 1956, ch. 169, §§ 1-5.

§ 51-9-11.
Donations by certain counties and municipalities.

The board of supervisors of any of the several counties of this state bordering on the Pearl River, or through which the Pearl River flows, and the governing authority of any municipality within any such county are each respectively hereby authorized and empowered, in their sole discretion, to appropriate and donate such a sum of money as said board of supervisors or governing authority shall deem reasonable and advisable to assist any nonprofit, nonshare corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi for the purpose of planning and developing the resources and industrial, agricultural, and recreational potentials of the Pearl River. Any donation made by the board of supervisors of any county or the governing authority of any municipality under the authority of this section shall be evidenced by an order spread upon the minutes of said board or governing authority, and shall be paid out of general funds in their respective treasuries, to be drawn by warrant thereon payable directly to such a nonprofit, nonshare corporation.

Any additional tax levy made to support any appropriations or donations under authority of this section shall not be refundable under the homestead exemption laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-91; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., ch. 12, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1963).